Vermont, session 2025-2026, H543.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to overrule the Vermont Supreme Court’s
decision in Zeno-Etheridge v. Comcast Corp., 219 Vt. 121 (2024) and permit a
post-traumatic stress disorder diagnosis to satisfy the required element of a
negligence claim that the plaintiff show actual injury.
Sec. 2. 12 V.S.A. § 1036a is added to read:
§ 1036a. NEGLIGENCE; ACTUAL INJURY; POST-TRAUMATIC STRESS
DISORDER
VT LEG #385568 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.543
2026 Page 2 of 2
In any civil action, the required element in a negligence claim of actual
injury to the plaintiff may be satisfied by a diagnosis of post-traumatic stress
disorder.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385568 v.1